Mississippi statutes. Title 43. Public Welfare
Chapter 43. Administration of Social Security Funds

§ 43-43-1.
Legislative intent.

It is the intent of the Mississippi Legislature to strengthen legislative oversight over the administration of federal funds provided under Title XX of the Social Security Act of 1935, as amended, originally enacted as Public Law 93-647.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 505, § 1, eff from and after Jan 1, 1980.

§ 43-43-3.
Appropriations of Title XX monies.

No state agency shall make expenditures of any federal Title XX monies, unless such expenditures are made pursuant to specific appropriations by the Legislature. In appropriating expenditures for social services as provided under Title XX, the Legislature shall specify the maximum amounts of funds to be expended by source of funds. To the extent not precluded by the terms and conditions under which financial aid is made available by the federal government, the Legislature may establish priorities for the activity being assisted and shall specify the major categories of services to be provided and the maximum amount to be expended in each category.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 505, § 2, eff from and after Jan 1, 1980.

§ 43-43-5.
Purchase of service contracts; advance of portion of cost of services.

All purchase of service contracts between the State Department of Public Welfare and individuals, associations or corporations other than state agencies shall be for the reimbursement of actual costs incurred in providing services. However, the State Department of Public Welfare in accordance with policy established by the State Board of Public Welfare may advance one-twelfth (1/12) of the total estimated cost for providing services under the twelve-month contractual agreement, upon written request of a contractor, to give the contractor a better cash flow. Any funds so advanced shall be withheld from the contract reimbursement payments and in no case shall the final reimbursement payment to the contractor exceed the actual cost incurred in providing services. Any contractor receiving such advance payments shall be strictly liable to ensure that same is adjusted to actual cost, including repayment of excess cash advances if necessary, prior to the final closeout of the purchase of service contract.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 505, § 3; Laws, 1988, ch. 382, eff from and after July 1, 1988.

§ 43-43-7.
Purchase of service budget request; contents.

The State Department of Public Welfare in its purchase of service budget request shall accurately reflect the comprehensive annual services program required under Section 2004 of Title XX. In submitting its annual budget recommendations to the Legislature, the legislative budget office shall include all federal Title XX monies received or anticipated by agencies as a part of the budget request in order to indicate for each budget category the amount of state monies requested, the amount of federal monies anticipated or due, the amount of other nonstate monies requested or anticipated and the total anticipated expenditure from all sources for each respective category. A similar breakdown of funding sources shall be shown for current and preceding fiscal periods. All Title XX purchase of service contracts shall be subject to such auditing procedures by the state department of audit as are applicable to all state agencies. Upon the direction of the Legislative Budget Office, additional evaluation of the Title XX system may be performed by an independent group with expertise in cost analysis and the evaluation of human service programs.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 505, § 4; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 211, eff from and after July 1, 1984.

§ 43-43-9.
Requirement of authorization before making assessment for services.

No state agency shall assess any charges for services provided by such agency under Title XX to any entity or individual, whether the services be administrative in nature or otherwise, unless such charges be specifically authorized both in principle and amount by the Legislature or, when the Legislature is out of session, by the state fiscal management board. All such charges, whether termed administrative charges, license fees, certification fees, user fees or by whatever name denominated, shall be included in the state budget report as prepared by the legislative budget office and shall be identified by source, purpose, amount and authorization. It is the intent of the Legislature that all such charges by an agency shall be reviewed annually by the Legislature to determine the necessity or continuing necessity for such charges and, if such charges are deemed appropriate and necessary, to include such charges in the agency’s appropriation bill.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 505, § 5; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 212, eff from and after July 1, 1984.